New York, session 2025-2026, S152.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 70.25 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 2-h to read as follows: 3 2-h. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when 4 a person is convicted of two or more felony counts and at least one of 5 which is an offense defined in article two hundred sixty-five of this 6 chapter involving the possession or use of an illegal firearm, rifle or 7 shotgun, the sentences must run consecutively. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00587-01-5